Vermont statutes. Title 7 Alcoholic Beverages, Cannabis, and Tobacco
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 201.
Licenses contingent on town vote.

Licenses of the first or second class shall not be granted by the control commissioners or the Board of Liquor and Lottery to be exercised in any city or town, the voters of which vote “No” on the question of whether to permit the sale of malt beverages and vinous beverages pursuant to section 161 of this title. Licenses of the third class shall not be granted by the Board of Liquor and Lottery to be exercised in any city or town, the voters of which vote “No” on the question of whether to sell fortified wines and spirits pursuant to section 161 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 83

, § 20;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 24.

§ 202.
Licenses to enforcement officer or control commissioner; exceptions.

No license of any class shall be granted to any enforcement officer or to any person acting in the officer’s behalf.

A member of a local control commission to whom or in behalf of whom a first- or second-class license was issued by that commission shall not participate in any control commission action regarding any first- or second-class license. If a majority of the members of a local control commission is unable to participate in a control commission action regarding any first- or second-class license, that action shall be referred to the Board of Liquor and Lottery for investigation and action.

An application for a first- or second-class license by or in behalf of a member of the local control commission or a complaint or disciplinary action regarding a first- or second-class license issued by a commission on which any member is a licensee shall be referred to the Board of Liquor and Lottery for investigation and action.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1981, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 66

, § 1, eff. June 18, 1991;

2009, No. 10

, § 2, eff. May 5, 2009;

2017, No. 83

, § 21;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 25.

§ 203.
Restrictions; financial interests; employees.

Except as provided in section 271 of this title, a packager, manufacturer, or rectifier licensed in Vermont or in another state, a certificate of approval holder, or a wholesale dealer shall not have any financial interest in the business of a first-, second-, or third-class licensee, and a first-, second-, or third-class licensee shall not have any financial interest in the business of a packager, manufacturer, or rectifier licensed in Vermont or in another state, a certificate of approval holder, or a wholesale dealer.
(a) (1) Except as provided in section 271 of this title, a packager, manufacturer, or rectifier licensed in Vermont or in another state, a certificate of approval holder, or a wholesale dealer shall not have any financial interest in the business of a first-, second-, or third-class licensee, and a first-, second-, or third-class licensee shall not have any financial interest in the business of a packager, manufacturer, or rectifier licensed in Vermont or in another state, a certificate of approval holder, or a wholesale dealer.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection and except as otherwise provided in section 271 of this title, a manufacturer of malt beverages may have a financial interest in the business of a first- or second-class license, and a first- or second-class licensee may have a financial interest in the business of a manufacturer of malt beverages, provided the first- or second-class licensee does not purchase, possess, or sell the malt beverages produced by a manufacturer with which there is any financial interest. Any manufacturer of malt beverages that has a financial interest in a first- or second-class licensee and any first- or second-class licensee that has a financial interest in a manufacturer of malt beverages, as permitted under this subdivision, shall provide to the Division of Liquor Control and the applicable wholesale dealer written notification of that financial interest and the licensees involved. A wholesale dealer shall not be in violation of this section for delivering malt beverages to a first- or second-class licensee that is prohibited from purchasing, possessing, or selling those malt beverages under this section.

An individual who is an employee of a wholesale dealer that does not hold a solicitor’s license may also be employed by a first- or second-class licensee on a paid or voluntary basis, provided that the employee does not exercise any control over, or participate in, the management of the first- or second-class licensee’s business or business decisions, and that neither employment relationship results in the exclusion of any competitor wholesale dealer or any brand of alcoholic beverages of a competitor wholesale dealer.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 1980;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 21, 2002;

2003, No. 24

, § 1, eff. May 14, 2003;

2003, No. 27

, § 1, eff. May 17, 2003;

2007, No. 94

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 64

, § 4;

2013, No. 72

, § 25;

2017, No. 83

, § 22;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 26.

§ 204.
Application and renewal fees for licenses and permits; disposition of fees.

The following fees shall be paid when applying for a new license or permit or to renew a license or permit:

For a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license to manufacture or rectify malt beverages, or vinous beverages and fortified wines, or spirits and fortified wines, $285.00 for each license.

For a packager’s license, $1,865.00.

For a wholesale dealer’s license, $1,245.00 for each location.

For a first-class license, $230.00.

For a second-class license, $140.00.

For a third-class license, $1,095.00 for an annual license and $550.00 for a six-month license. For a stand-alone third-class license, the issuing municipality may assess an additional $50.00 local processing fee.

For a shipping license for malt beverages or vinous beverages:

in-state consumer shipping license, $330.00.

out-of-state consumer shipping license, $330.00.

vinous beverages retail shipping license, $250.00.

For a caterer’s license, $250.00.
(8) (A) For a caterer’s license, $250.00.

For a commercial catering license, $220.00.

For a request to cater permit, $20.00.

For up to ten fourth-class licenses, $70.00.

For an industrial alcohol distributor’s license, $220.00.

For a special events permit, $35.00.

For a festival permit, $125.00.

For an alcoholic beverages tasting permit, $25.00.

For an educational sampling event permit, $250.00.

For an outside consumption permit, $20.00.

For a certificate of approval:

for malt beverages, $2,485.00;

for vinous beverages, $985.00.

For a solicitor’s license, $70.00.

For a vinous beverages storage license, $235.00.

For a promotional railroad tasting permit, $20.00.

For a special venue serving permit, $20.00.

For a fortified wine permit, $100.00.

For a retail delivery permit, $100.00.

For a destination resort master license, $1,000.00.

For a third-class license granted to the holder of a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license, $230.00.

Except for fees collected for first-, second-, and third-class licenses, the fees collected pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited in the Liquor Control Enterprise Fund. The other fees shall be distributed as follows:

Third-class license fees: 55 percent shall go to the Liquor Control Enterprise Fund and 45 percent shall go to the General Fund and shall fund alcohol abuse prevention and treatment programs. The local processing fee for stand-alone third-class licenses shall be retained by the issuing municipality.

First- and second-class license fees: At least 50 percent of first-class and second-class license fees shall go to the respective municipalities in which the licensed premises are located, and the remaining percentage of those fees shall go to the Liquor Control Enterprise Fund. A municipality may retain more than 50 percent of the fees that the municipality collected for first- and second-class licenses to the extent that the municipality has assumed responsibility for enforcement of those licenses pursuant to a contract with the Division. The Board of Liquor and Lottery shall adopt rules regarding contracts entered into pursuant to this subdivision.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 64

, § 2;

1975, No. 44

, § 3, eff. April 15, 1975;

1975, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 27, 1976;

1985, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 21, 2002;

2005, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 9, 2006;

2005, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7, 8, eff. May 10, 2006;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2007, No. 76

, § 8;

2007, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 19, 2008;

2009, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 11, 2010;

2011, No. 52

, § 77, eff. May 27, 2011;

2011, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2013, No. 72

, § 26;

2015, No. 51

, § A.12, eff. Jan. 1, 2016;

2015, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2017, No. 83

, § 23;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 27;

2021, No. 70

, § 1.

§ 205.
Terms of permits, licenses, and certificates.

All permits, licenses, and certificates shall expire one year after the date of issuance.

A permit, license, or certificate may be renewed as follows:

A first-class or second-class license, and an outside consumption permit associated with a first-class license, may be renewed by:

payment of the fee provided in section 204 of this title;

submission to the local control commissioners of an application demonstrating that the licensee satisfies all applicable rules and requirements; and

approval of the Board of Liquor and Lottery as provided in section 221, 222, or 227 of this title.

All other permits, licenses, and certificates may be renewed by:

payment of the fee provided in section 204 of this title; and

submission to the Board of Liquor and Lottery or the Division, as appropriate, of an application demonstrating that the holder satisfies all applicable rules and requirements.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 44

, § 4, eff. April 15, 1975;

1995, No. 63

, § 278a;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. June 21, 2002;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2007;

2017, No. 83

, § 24;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 28;

2019, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § E.237.1, eff. Oct. 2, 2020.

§ 206.
Disposal of fees.

The control commissioners shall collect all fees for first- and second-class licenses and shall pay the fees to the Division and the city and town treasurers of the respective cities and towns where the fees are collected as provided in subsection 204(b) of this chapter. The portion of each fee paid to the city or town may be used as it may direct, less a fee of $5.00 to be retained by the city or town clerk as a fee for issuing and recording the license. Except as otherwise provided in sections 274 and 275 of this title, fees for all other licenses shall be paid to the Board of Liquor and Lottery.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 84

, § 1;

1979, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 21, 2002;

2017, No. 83

, § 25;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 29.

§ 207.
Change of location.

If a licensee desires to change the location of its business before the expiration of its license, the licensee may submit an application to the Board of Liquor and Lottery, which may amend the license to cover the new premises without the payment of any additional fee.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 83

, § 26;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 30.

§ 208.
Display of license.

All licenses or permits granted under this title shall be conspicuously displayed on the premises for which the license or permit is granted.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 27.

§ 209.
Bankruptcy, death, and revocation.

If a licensee or permittee becomes bankrupt or dies before the expiration of its license or permit, the licensee’s or permittee’s trustee, executor, or administrator may sell the alcohol that came into its possession to a holder of a license or permit of the same class.

If a license or permit is revoked under the provisions of this title, after the revocation, the licensee or permittee may sell the alcohol in its possession at the time of the revocation to a holder of a license or permit of the same class.

All sales under this section shall be made within 30 days after the bankruptcy, death, or revocation and shall include immediate and actual delivery of the alcohol.
(c) (1) All sales under this section shall be made within 30 days after the bankruptcy, death, or revocation and shall include immediate and actual delivery of the alcohol.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, upon application of the executor or administrator of a deceased licensee or permittee, the Board may transfer the license or permit of the decedent to the executor or administrator without payment of any additional fee, and the executor or administrator may then carry on the business of the decedent under the license or permit until its expiration.

The holder of a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license may pledge or mortgage alcoholic beverages manufactured or rectified by the licensee and the pledgee or mortgagee may retain possession of the alcoholic beverages and, if the licensee defaults, may sell and dispose of the alcoholic beverages to persons to whom the licensee might lawfully sell the alcoholic beverages, subject to the same restrictions and regulations as the licensee and to any further restriction or rules prescribed by the Board of Liquor and Lottery with respect to advance notice to it of the sale and determination by it of the persons entitled to buy and the manner of the sale.
(d) (1) The holder of a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license may pledge or mortgage alcoholic beverages manufactured or rectified by the licensee and the pledgee or mortgagee may retain possession of the alcoholic beverages and, if the licensee defaults, may sell and dispose of the alcoholic beverages to persons to whom the licensee might lawfully sell the alcoholic beverages, subject to the same restrictions and regulations as the licensee and to any further restriction or rules prescribed by the Board of Liquor and Lottery with respect to advance notice to it of the sale and determination by it of the persons entitled to buy and the manner of the sale.

Any sale pursuant to a default on a pledge or mortgage shall not be at public auction as required with respect to similar sales of other property, but shall be upon not less than ten days’ notice to the pledgor or mortgagor and for the highest amount that may be offered pursuant to the rules of the Board of Liquor and Lottery.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 21, 2002;

2017, No. 83

, § 28;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 31.

§ 210.
Suspension or revocation of license or permit; administrative penalty.

The control commissioners or the Board of Liquor and Lottery shall have power to suspend or revoke any permit or license granted pursuant to this title in the event the person holding the permit or license shall at any time during the term of the permit or license conduct its business in violation of this title, the conditions pursuant to which the permit or license was granted, or any rule prescribed by the Board of Liquor and Lottery.
(a) (1) The control commissioners or the Board of Liquor and Lottery shall have power to suspend or revoke any permit or license granted pursuant to this title in the event the person holding the permit or license shall at any time during the term of the permit or license conduct its business in violation of this title, the conditions pursuant to which the permit or license was granted, or any rule prescribed by the Board of Liquor and Lottery.

No revocation shall be made until the permittee or licensee has been notified and given a hearing before the Board of Liquor and Lottery, unless the permittee or licensee has been convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of violating the provisions of this title.

In the case of a suspension, the permittee or licensee shall be notified and given a hearing before the Board of Liquor and Lottery or the local control commissioners, whichever applies.

Any decision to suspend or revoke a license shall be issued in writing and set forth the reasons for the suspension or revocation and, if applicable, the duration of the suspension.

A tobacco license may not be suspended or revoked for a first-time violation. Suspension or revocation of a tobacco license shall not affect any liquor license held by the licensee.

In addition to the authority to suspend or revoke any permit or license, the Board of Liquor and Lottery may impose an administrative penalty of up to $7,500.00 per violation against a holder of a wholesale dealer’s license or a holder of a first-, second-, or third-class license for a violation of the conditions of the license or of this title or of any rule adopted by the Board.
(b) (1) In addition to the authority to suspend or revoke any permit or license, the Board of Liquor and Lottery may impose an administrative penalty of up to $7,500.00 per violation against a holder of a wholesale dealer’s license or a holder of a first-, second-, or third-class license for a violation of the conditions of the license or of this title or of any rule adopted by the Board.

The administrative penalty may be imposed after a hearing before the Board or after the licensee has been convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of violating the provisions of this title.

The Board may also impose an administrative penalty under this subsection against a holder of a tobacco license of up to $250.00 for a first violation and up to $2,500.00 for subsequent violations.

For the first violation during a tobacco or alcohol compliance check during any three-year period, a licensee or permittee shall receive a warning and be required to attend a Division server training class.

For suspension or revocation proceedings involving a tobacco license or the imposition of an administrative penalty against a tobacco licensee under this section, the Commissioner, a Board member designated by the Chair, or a hearing officer designated by the Chair pursuant to section 211 of this title may conduct the hearing and render a decision.

The Board shall subpoena any person in this State to appear for a hearing or for a deposition in the same manner as prescribed for judicial procedures.
(d) (1) The Board shall subpoena any person in this State to appear for a hearing or for a deposition in the same manner as prescribed for judicial procedures.

Sheriffs and witnesses shall receive the same fees for the service of process and attendance before the Board as are paid in Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1989, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 70

, § 3, eff. May 1, 1992;

1993, No. 11

, § 1, eff. April 27, 1993;

1997, No. 58

, § 7;

2001, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 21, 2002;

2017, No. 83

, § 29;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 32;

2019, No. 73

, § 5.

§ 211.
Hearing officers.

The Chair of the Board of Liquor and Lottery may appoint a hearing officer to conduct hearings pursuant to section 210 of this title. A hearing officer may be a member of the Board appointed under section 210 of this title.

The hearing officer may administer oaths in all cases, so far as the exercise of that power is properly incidental to the performance of the hearing officer’s duty or that of the Board. A hearing officer may hold any hearing in any matter within the jurisdiction of the Board.

The hearing officer shall make findings of fact in writing to the Board in the form of a proposal for decision. A copy of the proposal for decision shall be served upon the parties pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 812

. Judgment on the hearing officer’s proposal for decision shall be rendered by a majority of the Board.

At least 10 days prior to a hearing, the hearing officer shall give written notice of the time and place of the hearing to all parties in the case and shall indicate either that the hearing will be before the Board or the name and title of the person designated to conduct the hearing.

The Chair may appoint a hearing officer to hear and finally determine any complaint involving a tobacco license. In such a case, the hearing officer may impose administrative penalties as provided in subsection 210(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 58

, § 8; amended

2017, No. 83

, § 30;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 33.

§ 212.
Complaints and prosecutions.

The Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery or the local control commissioners shall make complaint to the State’s Attorney or other designee of the legislative body of the municipality of any unlawful furnishing, selling, or keeping for sale of alcohol or alcoholic beverages and provide evidence in support of the complaint to the State’s Attorney or that municipal designee, who shall prosecute for the alleged violation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 33, eff. March 1, 1961;

2017, No. 83

, § 31;

2017, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 34.

§ 213.
Licensee education.

A new first-class, second-class, third-class, fourth-class, or manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license, or common carrier certificate shall not be granted until the applicant has attended a Division of Liquor Control in-person seminar or completed the appropriate Division of Liquor Control online training program for the purpose of being informed of the Vermont laws and rules pertaining to the purchase, storage, and sale of alcoholic beverages. A corporation, partnership, or association shall designate a director, partner, or manager who shall comply with the terms of this subsection.

Every holder of a first-class, second-class, third-class, fourth-class, or manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license, or common carrier certificate shall complete the Division of Liquor Control in-person licensee training seminar or the appropriate Division of Liquor Control online training program at least once every two years. A corporation, partnership, or association shall designate a director, partner, or manager who shall comply with the terms of this subsection.
(b) (1) Every holder of a first-class, second-class, third-class, fourth-class, or manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license, or common carrier certificate shall complete the Division of Liquor Control in-person licensee training seminar or the appropriate Division of Liquor Control online training program at least once every two years. A corporation, partnership, or association shall designate a director, partner, or manager who shall comply with the terms of this subsection.

A first-class, second-class, third-class, fourth-class, or manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license shall not be renewed unless the Division’s records show that the licensee has complied with the terms of this subsection.

Each licensee, permittee, or common carrier certificate holder shall ensure that every employee who is involved in the delivery, sale, or serving of alcoholic beverages completes a training program approved by the Division of Liquor Control before the employee begins delivering, serving, or selling alcoholic beverages and at least once every 24 months thereafter. Each licensee shall maintain written documentation, signed by each employee trained, of each training program conducted.
(c) (1) Each licensee, permittee, or common carrier certificate holder shall ensure that every employee who is involved in the delivery, sale, or serving of alcoholic beverages completes a training program approved by the Division of Liquor Control before the employee begins delivering, serving, or selling alcoholic beverages and at least once every 24 months thereafter. Each licensee shall maintain written documentation, signed by each employee trained, of each training program conducted.

A licensee may comply with this requirement by conducting its own training program on its premises, using information and materials furnished or approved by the Division of Liquor Control. A licensee who fails to comply with the requirements of this subsection shall be subject to a suspension of the license issued under this title for not less than one day or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both.

The following fees for Division of Liquor Control in-person or online seminars shall be paid:

For a first-class or first- and third-class licensee seminar either in-person or online, $25.00 per person.

For a second-class licensee seminar either in-person or online, $25.00 per person.

For a combination first-class, first- and third-class, and second-class licensee seminar either in-person or online, $25.00 per person.

For a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s, or fourth-class licensee seminar either in-person or online, $10.00 per person.

For common carrier seminars either in-person or online, $10.00 per person.

For all special event, festival, educational sampling, and special venue serving permit holders for either an in-person or online seminar, $10.00 per person.

Fees for all seminars listed in this section and under other sections of this title with regard to in-person or online training shall be deposited directly in the Liquor Control Enterprise Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 103

, § 4; amended

1993, No. 11

, § 3, eff. April 27, 1993;

1999, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2013, No. 64

, § 5;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2017, No. 83

, § 32;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 35;

2019, No. 73

, § 6.

§ 214.
Proof of financial responsibility.

Any first-, second-, or third-class licensee whose license is suspended by the local control commissioners or suspended or revoked by the Board of Liquor and Lottery for selling or furnishing alcoholic beverages to a minor, to a person apparently under the influence of alcohol, to a person after legal serving hours, or to a person who it would be reasonable to expect would be intoxicated as a result of the amount of alcoholic beverages served to that person shall be required to furnish to the Commissioner a certificate of financial responsibility within 60 days of the commencement of the suspension or revocation or at the time of reinstatement of the license, whichever is later. Financial responsibility may be established by any one or a combination of the following: insurance, surety bond, or letter of credit. Coverage shall be maintained at not less than $25,000.00 per occurrence and $50,000.00 aggregate per occurrence. Proof of financial responsibility shall be required for license renewal for the three years following the suspension or revocation.

Proof of financial responsibility and completion of the licensee education program established in section 213 of this title shall be conditions for a licensee to be permitted to resume operation after a suspension or revocation for any of the reasons in subsection (a) of this section.
(b) (1) Proof of financial responsibility and completion of the licensee education program established in section 213 of this title shall be conditions for a licensee to be permitted to resume operation after a suspension or revocation for any of the reasons in subsection (a) of this section.

However, at the discretion of the suspending or revoking authority, the licensee may receive a provisional license prior to the time these conditions are met in order to allow for compliance with the education requirement or to obtain the certificate of financial responsibility. A provisional license may not be issued for a period exceeding 60 days.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 103

, § 3; amended

2017, No. 83

, § 33;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 36.